Yamls/Pron-mod_gt-norm.yaml
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [мӧддэт, мӧддэзыт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [мӧддэтӧ, мӧддэзтӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [мӧддэтлӧн, мӧддэзытлӧн]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [мӧддэтлісь, мӧддэзытлісь]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [мӧддэтлӧ, мӧддэзытлӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: мӧддэзнат 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [мӧддэткӧт, мӧддэзыткӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [мӧддэттӧг, мӧддэзыттӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [мӧддэтла, мӧддэзытла]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [мӧддэтся, мӧддэзытся]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: мӧддэзат
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [мӧддэсит, мӧддэзсит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: мӧддэзат
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [мӧддэтлань, мӧддэзытлань, мӧддэзланят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [мӧддэтсянь, мӧддэзытсянь, мӧддэзсянят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [мӧддэзӧттят, мӧддэзӧттит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [мӧддэзӧдззат, мӧддэзӧдззит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [мӧддэтви, мӧддэзытви]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [мӧддэзланят, мӧддэтланьын, мӧддэзытланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg2: [мӧддэзланьсит, мӧддэтланись, мӧддэзытланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [мӧддэзланят, мӧддэтланьӧ, мӧддэзытланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [мӧддэтланьсянь, мӧддэзытланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсянят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [мӧддэтланьӧт, мӧддэзытланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттят, мӧддэзланьӧттит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [мӧддэтланьӧдз, мӧддэзытланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззат, мӧддэзланьӧдззит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [мӧддэтланьви, мӧддэзытланьви] 


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [мӧддэс, мӧддэзыс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [мӧддэсӧ, мӧддэзсӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [мӧддэслӧн, мӧддэзыслӧн]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [мӧддэслісь, мӧддэзыслісь]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [мӧддэслӧ, мӧддэзыслӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: мӧддэзнас 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [мӧддэскӧт, мӧддэзыскӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [мӧддэстӧг, мӧддэзыстӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьяс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [мӧддэсла, мӧддэзысла]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [мӧддэсся, мӧддэзысся]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: мӧддэзас
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [мӧддэсис, мӧддэзсис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: мӧддэзас
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [мӧддэслань, мӧддэзыслань, мӧддэзланяс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [мӧддэссянь, мӧддэзыссянь, мӧддэзсяняс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [мӧддэзӧттяс, мӧддэзӧттис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [мӧддэзӧдззас, мӧддэзӧдззис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [мӧддэсви, мӧддэзысви]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [мӧддэзланяс, мӧддэсланьын, мӧддэзысланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg3: [мӧддэзланьсис, мӧддэсланись, мӧддэзысланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [мӧддэзланяс, мӧддэсланьӧ, мӧддэзысланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [мӧддэсланьсянь, мӧддэзысланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсяняс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [мӧддэсланьӧт, мӧддэзысланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттяс, мӧддэзланьӧттис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [мӧддэсланьӧдз, мӧддэзысланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззас, мӧддэзланьӧдззис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [мӧддэсланьви, мӧддэзысланьви]

 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мӧддэзным
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымӧс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: мӧддэзнаным 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымтӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьяным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: мӧддэзаным
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [мӧддэсиным, мӧддэзсиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: мӧддэзаным
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымлань, мӧддэзланяным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымсянь, мӧддэзсяняным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [мӧддэзӧттяным, мӧддэзӧттиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [мӧддэзӧдззаным, мӧддэзӧдззиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [мӧддэзланяным, мӧддэзнымланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl1: [мӧддэзланьсиным, мӧддэзнымланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [мӧддэзланяным, мӧддэзнымланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсяняным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттяным, мӧддэзланьӧттиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [мӧддэзнымланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззаным, мӧддэзланьӧдззиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: мӧддэзнымланьви 


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мӧддэзныт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: мӧддэзнаныт 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl2: мӧддэзныткӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [мӧддэзныттӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьяныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: мӧддэзаныт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [мӧддэсиныт, мӧддэзсиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: мӧддэзаныт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [мӧддэзнытлань, мӧддэзланяныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [мӧддэзнытсянь, мӧддэзсяняныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [мӧддэзӧттяныт, мӧддэзӧттиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [мӧддэзӧдззаныт, мӧддэзӧдззиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [мӧддэзланяныт, мӧддэзнытланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl2: [мӧддэзланьсиныт, мӧддэзнытланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [мӧддэзланяныт, мӧддэзнытланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [мӧддэзнытланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсяняныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [мӧддэзнытланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттяныт, мӧддэзланьӧттиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [мӧддэзнытланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззаныт, мӧддэзланьӧдззиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: мӧддэзнытланьви 


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мӧддэзныс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мӧддэзнысӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мӧддэзныслӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: мӧддэзныслісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: мӧддэзныслӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: мӧддэзнаныс 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl3: мӧддэзныскӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [мӧддэзныстӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьяныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: мӧддэзнысла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: мӧддэзнысся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: мӧддэзаныс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [мӧддэсиныс, мӧддэзсиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: мӧддэзаныс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [мӧддэзныслань, мӧддэзланяныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [мӧддэзныссянь, мӧддэзсяняныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [мӧддэзӧттяныс, мӧддэзӧттиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [мӧддэзӧдззаныс, мӧддэзӧдззиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: мӧддэзнысви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [мӧддэзланяныс, мӧддэзнысланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl3: [мӧддэзланьсиныс, мӧддэзнысланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [мӧддэзланяныс, мӧддэзнысланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [мӧддэзнысланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсяняныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [мӧддэзнысланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттяныс, мӧддэзланьӧттиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [мӧддэзнысланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззаныс, мӧддэзланьӧдззиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: мӧддэзнысланьви 
